v11.dix
<pardef n="mAd/u_v">
        <e><p>
                <l>ixanu</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixalYu</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>iwu</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixavu</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixaru</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixeV</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixiri</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixeVnu</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ixeVvu</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwixxAneV</l>
				<r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwixxAlYeV</l>
				<r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwixeV</l>
				<r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwiveV</l>
				<r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwixxeveV</l>
				<r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwixxIya</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwixxIri</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwixxeneV</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwiruveVnu</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwixxeveV</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwiruveVvu</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uxxAneV</l>
				<r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uxxAlYeV</l>
				<r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwaxeV</l>
				<r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwaveV</l>
				<r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwAreV</l>
				<r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwIya</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwwIri</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uviri</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwweneV</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
				<l>uveVnu</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uwweveV</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>uveVvu</l>
                <r>u<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
</pardef>

<e lm="holu"><i>hol</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kavicu"><i>kavic</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kummu"><i>kumm</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="akkulYisu"><i>akkulYis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="attu"><i>att</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="Bogisu"><i>Bogis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="mannAmAdu"><i>mannAmAd</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="axumu"><i>axum</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="uggu"><i>ugg</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="ujju"><i>ujj</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="uxuru"><i>uxur</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="eVragu"><i>eVrag</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="attu"><i>att</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="anulakRisu"><i>anulakRis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="Udu"><i>Ud</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="arasu"><i>aras</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="alasu"><i>alas</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="aswamisu"><i>aswamis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="Adu"><i>Ad</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="ittigeVmAdu"><i>ittigeVmAd</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="ulYuku"><i>ulYuk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="eVbbisu"><i>eVbbis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="edisu"><i>edis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="oVwwu"><i>oVww</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="oVppu"><i>oVpp</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="olAdu"><i>olAd</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kaMpisu"><i>kaMpis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kawwarisu"><i>kawwaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kaxalu"><i>kaxal</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kalYacu"><i>kalYac</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kAxu"><i>kAx</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kuttu"><i>kutt</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="keVkkarisu"><i>keVkkaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="keVxaku"><i>keVxak</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kegu"><i>keg</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kEmAdu"><i>kEmAd</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="kRINisu"><i>kRINis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="gabbarisu"><i>gabbaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="galYahu"><i>galYah</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="gittisu"><i>gittis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="gunugu"><i>gunug</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="gUbeVkUrisu"><i>gUbeVkUris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="Gatisu"><i>Gatis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="capparisu"><i>capparis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="civutu"><i>civut</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="cuccu"><i>cucc</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="cewarisu"><i>cewaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="jagulYu"><i>jagulY</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="jamAyisu"><i>jamAyis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="jAlYIsu"><i>jAlYIs</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="jIvu"><i>jIv</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="jvalisu"><i>jvalis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="teVMtaNisu"><i>teVMtaNis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="waMgu"><i>waMg</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="wadavarisu"><i>wadavaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="wapisu"><i>wapis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="warubu"><i>warub</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="walYisu"><i>walYis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="wAlYahAku"><i>wAlYahAk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="wiguru"><i>wigur</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="wiraskarisu"><i>wiraskaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="wirucu"><i>wiruc</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="wIrisu"><i>wIris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="wuMdarisu"><i>wuMdaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="wUru"><i>wUr</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="weku"><i>wek</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="welisu"><i>welis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="woVxalu"><i>woVxal</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="woVlYagu"><i>woVlYag</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="wodu"><i>wod</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="xakku"><i>xakk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="xabAyisu"><i>xabAyis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="xayamAdu"><i>xayamAd</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="xittisu"><i>xittis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="xuvvAlYisu"><i>xuvvAlYis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="xqDapadisu"><i>xqDapadis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="xravisu"><i>xravis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="Xumuku"><i>Xumuk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="namUxisu"><i>namUxis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="naSisu"><i>naSis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="nAtu"><i>nAt</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="nimiru"><i>nimir</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="nirNayisu"><i>nirNayis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="nirvahisu"><i>nirvahis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="nIgu"><i>nIg</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="nUku"><i>nUk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="nodu"><i>nod</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="padiwalYisu"><i>padiwalYis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="parAmarisu"><i>parAmaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="pariRkarisu"><i>pariRkaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="pilYakisu"><i>pilYakis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="pUrEsu"><i>pUrEs</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="poRisu"><i>poRis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="praxarSisu"><i>praxarSis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="prArWisu"><i>prArWis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="baggu"><i>bagg</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="badabadisu"><i>badabadis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="bareVhAku"><i>bareVhAk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="bAyibidu"><i>bAyibid</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="biMbisu"><i>biMbis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="bIgu"><i>bIg</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="berpadu"><i>berpad</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="BAgavahisu"><i>BAgavahis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="maNisu"><i>maNis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="maralYu"><i>maralY</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="mAcu"><i>mAc</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="miMcu"><i>miMc</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="minugu"><i>minug</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="mugisu"><i>mugis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="muxuru"><i>muxur</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="mulYlYuhoVyyisu"><i>mulYlYuhoVyyis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="meyisu"><i>meyis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="moVtakugoVlYisu"><i>moVtakugoVlYis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="racisu"><i>racis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="rubbu"><i>rubb</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="lakalakisu"><i>lakalakis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="lAgAhAku"><i>lAgAhAk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="vatAyisu"><i>vatAyis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="vAjisu"><i>vAjis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="viwarisu"><i>viwaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="vilaMGisu"><i>vilaMGis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="veRahAku"><i>veRahAk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="saMskarisu"><i>saMskaris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="savaru"><i>savar</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="sAyisu"><i>sAyis</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="siluku"><i>siluk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="sUreVhogu"><i>sUreVhog</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="soVppuhAku"><i>soVppuhAk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="sPurisu"><i>sPuris</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="haccu"><i>hacc</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="haxugu"><i>haxug</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="haravu"><i>harav</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="hAyu"><i>hAy</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="hiMdugattu"><i>hiMdugatt</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="hicuku"><i>hicuk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="hugu"><i>hug</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="heVdeVgattu"><i>heVdeVgatt</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="hoVMcuhAku"><i>hoVMcuhAk</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
<e lm="hoVmmu"><i>hoVmm</i><par n="mAd/u_v"/></e>
